apertium-pl-csb.pl.dix
    <pardef n="Kowals/ki__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiego</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiemu</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiego</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cy</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kich</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kich</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kimi</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kich</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cy</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiej</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiej</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ką</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ką</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiej</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kie</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kich</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kie</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kimi</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kich</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kie</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Kozyr/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__mp_pl"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__viagra"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mikulicz__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__mp_pl"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="Mikulicz"><i>Mikulicz</i><par n="Mikulicz__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kozyra"><i>Kozyr</i><par n="Kozyr/a__np"/></e>
